New York, session 2025-2026, S7298.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 2281 of the vehi- 2 cle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 319 of the laws of 1997, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) "All terrain vehicle" or "ATV" means any self-propelled vehicle 5 which is manufactured for sale for operation primarily on off-highway 6 trails or off-highway competitions and only incidentally operated on 7 public highways providing that such vehicle does not exceed [seventy] 8 eighty inches in width, or [one] two thousand pounds dry weight. 9 Provided, however, this definition shall not include a "snowmobile" or 10 other self-propelled vehicles manufactured for off-highway use exclu- 11 sively designed for travel on snow or ice, steered by skis or runners 12 and supported in whole or in part by one or more skis, belts or cleats 13 which utilize an endless belt tread. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02549-01-5